Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.450

Service of process, notice, or demand on entity.

(1) A represented entity may be served with any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law by serving its registered agent.

(2) If a represented entity ceases to have a registered agent, or if its registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be served, the entity may be served by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, or by similar commercial delivery service, addressed to the entity at the entity's principal office. The address of the principal office must be as shown in the entity's most recent annual report filed by the secretary of state. Service is effected under this subsection on the earliest of:

(a) The date the entity receives the mail or delivery by the commercial delivery service;

(b) The date shown on the return receipt, if executed by the entity; or

(c) Five days after its deposit with the United States postal service or commercial delivery service, if correctly addressed and with sufficient postage or payment.

(3) If process, notice, or demand cannot be served on an entity pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section, service may be made by handing a copy to the individual in charge of any regular place of business or activity of the entity if the individual served is not a plaintiff in the action.

(4) The secretary of state shall be an agent of the entity for service of process if process, notice, or demand cannot be served on an entity pursuant to subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section.

(5) Service of process, notice, or demand on a registered agent must be in a tangible medium, but service may be made on a commercial registered agent in other forms, and subject to such requirements, as the agent has stated in its listing under RCW 23.95.420 that it will accept.

(6) Service of process, notice, or demand may be made by other means under law other than this chapter.

[ 2020 c 57 s 33; 2015 c 176 s 1411.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.